tests/abbreviations.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kir.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kir.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] Abbreviations in %{а%}":
    АКШ<np><top><nom> : АКШ
    АКШ<np><top><acc> : АКШны
    АКШ<np><top><gen> : АКШнын
    АКШ<np><top><loc> : АКШда
    АКШ<np><top><abl> : АКШдан
    АКШ<np><top><dat> : АКШга

  "[twol] Abbreviations in %{э%}:%{й%}":
    КР<np><top><nom> : КР
    КР<np><top><acc> : КРди
    КР<np><top><gen> : КРдин
    КР<np><top><loc> : КРде
    КР<np><top><abl> : КРден
    КР<np><top><dat> : КРге
